North Dakota, session 69, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRICING.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying prescription
drug pricing and the maximum fair price for a drug as published by the secretary of the United
States department of health and human services.
2. The study must include consideration of federal drug price negotiations under the Federal
Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 [Pub. L. 117-169; 26 U.S.C. 55 et seq.] and overlap with
current drugs paid for by the public employees retirement system to determine usage and
potential cost-savings to the state and consumers.
3. The study must include input from:
a. The public employees retirement system;
b. The insurance commissioner;
c. The state board of pharmacy; and
d. Other stakeholders.
4. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

H. B. NO. 1543 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1543.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 4 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State